District of Columbia statutes.
3-801

Repealed

Created; composition; duties; Chairman; meetings.

Repealed.

June 29, 1953, 67 Stat. 101, ch. 159, § 401
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a), 157(f)
June 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-320, § 513, 60 DCR 3390
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.
The Act of October 17, 1968, Pub. L. 90-578, terminated the office of United States Commissioner and established in place thereof the office of United States Magistrate, referred to in subsection (b)(6) of this section. The Act became operative in the District on June 27, 1969, when 2 United States Magistrates assumed office pursuant to appointment by order of the District Court, dated June 20, 1969.
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 514 of the Omnibus Criminal Code Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-44, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5381, 20 DCSTAT 1281).
For temporary repeal of section, see § 514 of the Omnibus Criminal Code Amendments Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-599, January 14, 2013, 60 DCR 1017).
1973 Ed., § 2-1901.
1981 Ed., § 2-1001.